Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.148

Foster care liaison—Building point of contact.

(1) For the purpose of addressing education barriers for students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding, each school district must: (a) Designate a foster care liaison to facilitate district compliance with state and federal laws related to students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding; and (b) collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families, the appropriate federally recognized Indian tribe, or the state agency responsible for the implementation of the unaccompanied refugee minors program. The role and responsibilities of a foster care liaison may include:

(a) [(i)] Coordinating the implementation of state and federal laws related to students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding;

(b) [(ii)] Coordinating with foster care education program staff at the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(c) [(iii)] Attending training and professional development opportunities to improve school district implementation efforts;

(d) [(iv)] Serving as the primary contact person for representatives of the department of children, youth, and families;

(e) [(v)] Leading and documenting the development of a process for making best interest determinations in accordance with RCW 28A.225.350;

(f) [(vi)] Facilitating immediate enrollment in accordance with RCW 28A.225.330;

(g) [(vii)] Facilitating the transfer of records in accordance with RCW 28A.150.510 and 28A.225.330;

(h) [(viii)] Facilitating data sharing with child welfare agencies consistent with state and federal privacy laws and rules;

(i) [(ix)] Developing and coordinating local transportation procedures;

(j) [(x)] Managing best interest determination and transportation cost disputes according to the best practices developed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction;

(k) [(xi)] Ensuring that students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding are enrolled in and regularly attending school, consistent with RCW 28A.225.023; and

(l) [(xii)] Providing professional development and training to school staff on state and federal laws related to students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding and their educational needs, as needed.

(2) Each K-12 public school in the state must establish a building point of contact in each elementary school, middle school, and high school. These points of contact must be appointed by the principal of the designated school, in consultation with the district foster care liaison, and are responsible for coordinating services and resources for students in foster care as outlined in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) The district foster care liaison is responsible for training building points of contact.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make available best practices for choosing and training building points of contact to each school district.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "students who are the subject of a dependency proceeding" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.510.

[ 2022 c 78 s 5; 2021 c 95 s 2; 2018 c 139 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2021 c 95: "The legislature acknowledges that students in foster care often face additional challenges, both academically and emotionally. When students are connected with a caring adult, are attending school regularly, and have the supports they need, they are more likely to be successful in school and in life. Schools, child welfare agencies, communities, and families must work together to provide the equitable opportunities, specialized services, and useful supports that are essential for students in foster care. By establishing a building point of contact, the legislature intends to further support coordination of resources and facilitation of compliance with state and federal laws related to students who are dependent pursuant to chapter 13.34 RCW." [ 2021 c 95 s 1.]

Effective date—2018 c 139: See note following RCW 28A.225.350.